District of Columbia statutes.
7-871.04

Enforcement.

(a)

If the Mayor has reason to believe that there has been a violation of this chapter or of the regulations issued pursuant to this chapter, the Mayor may:

(1)

Give written notice of the alleged violation, which shall include the provision of the law or regulation alleged to be violated, the facts alleged to constitute a violation, and an order that necessary corrective action be taken within a specified time set forth in the notice; or

(2)

Impose civil or criminal fines and penalties in accordance with § 7-871.05.

(b)

Any party adversely affected by an action taken pursuant to subsection (a) of this section is entitled to a hearing before the Mayor upon filing with the Mayor, within 15 days from the date of the action, a written request for a hearing. The hearing shall be held in accordance with the requirements of subchapter I of Chapter 5 of Title 2.

History

Oct. 1, 2002, D.C. Law 14-190, § 2004, 49 DCR 6968

Prior Codifications

2001 Ed., § 7-1034.